Utah statutes.
57-27-203.   Decontamination of real property.

(1)  A government subdivision or agency may charge an owner or lessor a fee, in accordance with the provisions of Section 63J-1-504, for:

(a)  a permit issued by the subdivision or agency to decontaminate a property;

(b)  the subdivision or agency to determine whether or not the property has been decontaminated; and

(c)  any other related service provided by the subdivision or agency, including investigation or decontamination of the property.

(2)  A government subdivision or agency may not prohibit an owner or lessor from decontaminating the owner's or lessor's real property.



Enacted by Chapter 194, 2009 General Session

